District of Columbia statutes.
50-2537

Mount Pleasant Visitor Pass Pilot Program.

(a)

The Mayor shall implement a one-year visitor parking pilot program for residential permit parking areas within ANC1D boundaries.

(b)

For the purposes of this pilot program, DDOT may:

(1)

Charge a fee for each permit issued pursuant to this program; and

(2)

Limit the hours for which a visitor parking permit is valid.

(c)

Within 90 days of November 25, 2008, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this section. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, by resolution, within the 30-day period, the rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-279, § 8, 55 DCR 11059

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2551.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 17-279, § 9, prohibiting the issuance of citations to a vehicle displaying a visitor parking permit valid as of September 30, 2013, see § 2 of the Visitor Parking Pass Preservation Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-58, December 13, 2013, 60 DCR 15170).
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 17-279, § 10, concerning renewal of visitor parking permits, see § 2 of the Visitor Parking Pass Preservation Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-58, December 13, 2013, 60 DCR 15170).
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 17-279, § 11, prohibiting the issuance of a visitor parking permit to a residence that was ineligible to receive a visitor parking permit as of September 15, 2013, see § 2 of the Visitor Parking Pass Preservation Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-58, December 13, 2013, 60 DCR 15170).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 17-279, § 9, see § 2 of the Visitor Parking Pass Preservation Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-172, September 30, 2013, 60 DCR 14748).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 17-279, § 10, see § 2 of the Visitor Parking Pass Preservation Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-172, September 30, 2013, 60 DCR 14748).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 17-279, § 11, see § 2 of the Visitor Parking Pass Preservation Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-172, September 30, 2013, 60 DCR 14748).